Utah statutes.
26-8a-301.   General requirement.
(1)  Except as provided in Section 26-8a-308 or 26-8b-201:
(a)  an individual may not provide emergency medical services without a
certificate issued under Section 26-8a-302;
(b)  a facility or provider may not hold itself out as a designated emergency
medical service provider without a designation issued under Section 26-8a-303;
(c)  a vehicle may not operate as an ambulance or emergency response vehicle
without a permit issued under Section 26-8a-304; and
(d)  an entity may not respond as an ambulance or paramedic provider without
the appropriate license issued under Part 4, Ambulance and Paramedic
Providers.
(2)  Section 26-8a-502 applies to violations of this section.
